src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
! Verbs
! =====

LEXICON MergeRight
0:}.m%>.{ Template ; ! % literalizes the >

LEXICON Template
+FormI:CVCVC MergeLeft ;
+FormIII:CVVCVC MergeLeft ;

LEXICON MergeLeft
0:}.%<m. Vocalization ; ! % literalizes the <

LEXICON Vocalization
+Act:[a+] RBound ;
+Pass:[u*i] RBound ;

LEXICON RBound
]:^] PerfEnd ;

LEXICON PerfEnd
+3P+Masc+Sg:a # ;
+3P+Fem+Sg:at # ;
